Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska51-410.01
Nebraska Library Commission Cash Fund; created; how funded.

There is hereby created a fund to be known as the Nebraska Library Commission Cash Fund, from which shall be appropriated such amounts as are available and as shall be considered incident to the administration of the Nebraska Library Commission. All funds received by the Nebraska Library Commission for services rendered shall be paid into the state treasury and the State Treasurer shall credit the money to the Nebraska Library Commission Cash Fund.

Laws 1975, LB 550, § 1.